src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON CompSup-EVENWEAKSTEM  !!= @CODE@
                          +Sg+Gen:       ENDLEX   ;
                          +Sg+Abe:#dagi  ENDLEX   ;
                          +Sg+Abe:#dagá  ENDLEX   ;
                          +Sg+Abe:#tagá  ENDLEX   ;
         +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:       PxV      ; ! !
                          +Sg+Acc:v      ENDLEX   ;
         +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:       PxV      ; ! !
                          +Sg+Ine:n      ENDLEX   ;
         +Sg+Ine+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:n%>    PxC      ; ! !
                          +Sg+Ela:s      ENDLEX   ;
         +Sg+Ela+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:st%>   PxC      ; ! !
                          +Pl+Nom:       ENDLEX   ;
         +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:       PxNomPlV ; ! !
                          +Pl+Gen:j      ENDLEX   ;
                          +Pl+Abe:j#dagi ENDLEX   ;
                          +Pl+Abe:j#dagá ENDLEX   ;
                          +Pl+Abe:j#tagá ENDLEX   ;
         +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:j%>    PxC      ; ! !
                          +Pl+Acc:jt     ENDLEX   ;
         +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:jd%>   PxC      ; ! !
                          +Pl+Ill:jda    ENDLEX   ;
         +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:jdis%> PxCs     ; ! !
                          +Pl+Ine:jn     ENDLEX   ;
         +Pl+Ine+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:jn%>   PxC      ; ! !
                          +Pl+Ela:js     ENDLEX   ;
         +Pl+Ela+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:jst%>  PxC              ; ! !
                          +Pl+Com:j      ENDLEX   ;
         +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:j%>    PxC      ; ! !
                  +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jna  ENDLEX   ; !
                          +Sg+Com:X5jn   ENDLEX   ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg. Note two dummies in a row!
         +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X5jn%> PxC      ; ! !

LEXICON CompSup-ODDCASE
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:        PxC  ; ! !
                          +Sg+Gen:a       ENDLEX ;
                          +Sg+Abe:a#dagi  ENDLEX ;
                          +Sg+Abe:a#dagá  ENDLEX ;
                          +Sg+Abe:a#tagá  ENDLEX ;
         +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:        PxC    ; ! !
                          +Sg+Acc:av      ENDLEX ;
         +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:        PxC    ; ! !
                          +Sg+Ill:ij      ENDLEX ; ! Px ?? !!
         +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:as%>    PxCs   ; ! !
                          +Sg+Ine:in      ENDLEX ;
         +Sg+Ine+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:in%>    PxCs   ; ! !
                          +Sg+Ela:is      ENDLEX ;
         +Sg+Ela+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ist%>   PxCs   ; ! !
                          +Sg+Com:ijn     ENDLEX ;
                  +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ijna    ENDLEX ; !
         +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ijn%>   PxCs   ; ! !
                             +Ess:in      ENDLEX ;
                          +Pl+Nom:a       ENDLEX ;
                          +Pl+Gen:ij      ENDLEX ;
                          +Pl+Abe:ij#dagi ENDLEX ;
                          +Pl+Abe:ij#dagá ENDLEX ;
                          +Pl+Abe:ij#tagá ENDLEX ;
         +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ij%>    PxCs   ; ! !
                          +Pl+Acc:ijt     ENDLEX ;
         +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ijd%>   PxCs   ; ! !
                          +Pl+Ill:ijda    ENDLEX ;
         +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ijdas%> PxC    ; ! !
                          +Pl+Ine:ijn     ENDLEX ;
         +Pl+Ine+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ijn%>   PxCs   ; ! !
                          +Pl+Ela:ijs     ENDLEX ;
         +Pl+Ela+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ijst%>  PxCs ; ! !
                          +Pl+Com:ij      ENDLEX ;
         +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:ij%>    PxCs ; ! !





! Adj declension
! ---------------

LEXICON ATTR  !!= @CODE@ Sends attributes to
     +Attr:   NAMÁK  ;
     +Attr:   ENDLEX ; ! Plain attributive.
 +Cmp/Attr:   R      ;
     +Attr:   VUOHTA ;
! -:#%- ProperNoun ;   !already in LEXICON R !
! : ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj


LEXICON ATTR_PrsPrc  !!= @CODE@ Attr without -vuohta derivation.
     +Attr:   NAMÁK  ;
     +Attr:   ENDLEX ; ! Plain attributive
 +Cmp/Attr:    R     ;
! -:#%- ProperNoun ;   !already in LEXICON R !
! : ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj



!! !!Derivation of adjectives
! ------------------------

LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1 !!= @CODE@ ! even noun stems are sent here
      +Der1+Der/Car+A:Q1      DIBME  ;
 +Der1+Der/Car+A:Q1dis%> ATTR   ;
! +Der1+Der/Car+A:Q1dis VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
!      +Der1+Der/Car+A:Q1d     DUVVAT ; ! this is incorrect, denominal -dibme adjectives cannot be derived to a verb, at least it should be -dimeduvvat, not only -duvvat?
                   +Abe:Q1dak   ENDLEX ;
                   +Abe:Q1da    ENDLEX ;
                   
LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1_1 !!= @CODE@ ! even noun stems without grade alternation are sent here
      +Der1+Der/Car+A:      DIBME  ;
 +Der1+Der/Car+A:dis%> ATTR   ;
! +Der1+Der/Car+A:dis VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
!      +Der1+Der/Car+A:d     DUVVAT ; ! this is incorrect, denominal -dibme adjectives cannot be derived to a verb, at least it should be -dimeduvvat, not only -duvvat?
                   +Abe:dak   ENDLEX ;
                   +Abe:da    ENDLEX ;

LEXICON DenominalAdjsV2 !!= @CODE@ ! even noun stems are sent here. -asj derivation
 +Der1+Der/lasj:X7l DÁRBULASJ ;

LEXICON DenominalAdjsKINO !!= @CODE@ ! unassimilated nouns are sent here
      +Der1+Der/Car+A:      DIBME      ;
      +Der1+Der/Car+A:dis%> ATTR       ;
! +Der1+Der/Car+A:dis VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
!      +Der1+Der/Car+A:d     DUVVAT     ; ! this is incorrect, denominal -dibme adjectives cannot be derived to a verb, at least it should be -dimeduvvat, not only -duvvat?
!+Der4+Der/ahtes:g AHTES ; Only for odd-syllable stems
!+Der4+Der/ahtes:d AHTES ;
                   +Abe:dak   ENDLEX     ;
                   +Abe:da    ENDLEX     ;
         +Der1+Der/lasj:l     DÁRBULASJ  ;


LEXICON DenominalAdjsODD !!= @CODE@  ! gives derivation -ahtes
        +Der4+Der/ahtes: AHTES ;
  !+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahtá%>  K    ;
 !+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahti%>  K    ;
!+Abe:adak K ; Odd-syllable stems donºt get the abessiv -dak, itºs only for párra and contracted stems.
!+Abe:ada K ;

LEXICON DenominalAdjsContr !!= @CODE@
      +Der1+Der/Car+A:      DIBME  ;
      +Der1+Der/Car+A:dis%> ATTR   ;
! +Der1+Der/Car+A:dis VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
!      +Der1+Der/Car+A:d     DUVVAT ; ! this is incorrect, denominal -dibme adjectives cannot be derived to a verb, at least it should be -dimeduvvat, not only -duvvat?
                   +Abe:dak   ENDLEX ;
                   +Abe:da    ENDLEX ;

!! !! Derivations to adjectives

LEXICON AHTES !!= @CODE@ ! odd syllable
                        +A:ahtes%>    ATTR              ;
!        +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahtá%>    ENDLEX            ; !- ahtá is not adverb, according to Bruce Morén-Duolljá its a case like essive.
!        +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahti%>    ENDLEX            ;
                 +A+Sg+Nom:ahtes%>    ENDLEX            ;
        +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ahttá%>    PxV               ; !
                    +A+Ess:ahttá%>n   ENDLEX            ;
! +A:ahtes VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                        +A:ahttá%>    ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                        +A:ahttá%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
               +A+Cmp/SgGen:ahttá%>    R                 ;
               +A+Cmp/PlGen:ahttá%>j   R                 ;
                        +A:ahttá%>    BU/MUS            ;
                        +A:ahttás%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj    ;
                        +A:ahttás%>   ABBO/AMOS         ;
        +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahttás%>it ENDLEX            ;
                        +A:ahttás%>   ODDCmp            ;
