src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
bellukahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:belluk AHTES ; !
birratjuohpamahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:birra#tjuohpam AHTES ; !
buollnadahtes:buollnad AHTES ;
buollnamahtes:buollnam AHTES ;
buollnamahtes:buollnamm AHTES ;
buorránahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buorrán AHTES ; !
diehtemahtes:diehtem AHTES ;
duhtamahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duhtam AHTES ; !
dádjadahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dádjad AHTES ; !
dåbddåmahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dåbddåm AHTES ; !
dåjmagahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dåjmag AHTES ; !
gierddamahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gierddam AHTES ; !
gullogahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gullog AHTES ; !
gåhtsemahtes:gåhtsem AHTES ;
hiebalgahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hiebalg AHTES ; !
huomajahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:huomaj AHTES ; !
jubmelahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jubmel AHTES ; !
materiáladahtes:materi^álad AHTES ;
nåhkåmahtes:nåhkåm AHTES ;
oahppamahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oahppam AHTES ; !
rievtesferdugahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rievtes#ferdug AHTES ; !
rievtugahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rievtug AHTES ; !
sárnnomahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sárnnom AHTES ; !
såbadahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:såbad AHTES ; !
såbadimahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:såbadim AHTES ; !
såhpamahtes:såhpam AHTES ;
såjågahtes:såjåg AHTES ;
vielldemahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vielldem AHTES ; !
vuojnnemahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuojnnem AHTES ; !
vuojttemahtes:vuojttem AHTES ;
várrogahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:várrog AHTES ; !
ájggomahtes:ájggom AHTES ;
ájlisahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ájlis AHTES ; !
áljisahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:áljis AHTES ; !
ánssidahtes:ánssid AHTES ;
årodahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:årod AHTES ; !
åskeldahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:åskeld AHTES ; !
åskåldahtes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:åskåld AHTES ; !
